Washington statutes.
RCW 43.300.090

Notification requirements.

Actions under this chapter are subject to the notification requirements of RCW 43.17.400.

[ 2007 c 62 s 6.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—2007 c 62: See notes following RCW 43.17.400.